Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1098 of Title 64, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma
Invasive Woody Species Stewardship for State-Leased Lands Act”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1099 of Title 64, unless there
is a duplication created in numbering, reads as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2169 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

A. As used in this act, “invasive woody species” means a native
or non-native tree or shrub species that threatens and causes harm
to the environment, water resources, or economy. Invasive woody
species include, but are not limited to, Juniperus virginiana
(Eastern Redcedar), Juniperus scopulorum (Rocky Mountain juniper),
Juniperus monosperma (oneseed juniper), and Tamarix ramosissima
(salt cedar), and is consistent with “Harmful woody species” as used
and defined in the Terry Peach North Canadian Watershed Restoration
Act, codified in Title 27A, Section 3-8-102(2).
B. As established by the Oklahoma Constitution, the
Commissioners are responsible for the management of the permanent
school fund and the management of trust assets for the exclusive
purpose of providing maximum benefits to current and future
beneficiaries. Invasive woody species threaten to, and have caused
harm to, the environment, water resources, and economy, including
having caused harm to and devaluing trust assets and the permanent
school fund. Invasive woody species are likely to cause further
harm and further devalue to Commission trust assets of the permanent
school fund. To protect and maintain the value of trust assets of
the permanent school fund, and in order to manage trust assets for
the benefit of current and future beneficiaries, the Commissioners
are hereby authorized to remove and manage Invasive woody species as
described in this act.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2169 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. By December 15 of each year the Commission shall identify
and prioritize trust lands that have been harmed and devalued by
Invasive woody species and shall submit a management plan to the
Oklahoma Conservation Commission outlining the strategy it intends
to employ for the removal and ongoing maintenance of Invasive woody
species on such trust lands.
D. The Commission is specifically authorized to:
1. Enter into programs run by, and coordinate with, the
Oklahoma Conservation Commission for the removal and management of
Invasive woody species;
2. Enter into programs run by, and coordinate with, other state
or federal agencies for the removal and management of Invasive woody
species;
3. Enter into programs run by, coordinate with, or contract
with as vendors, entities lawfully engaging in proscribed burns for
the removal and management of Invasive woody species;
4. Contract with vendors for the removal and management of
Invasive woody species;
5. Contract with its lessees for the removal and management of
Invasive woody species; and
6. Engage in any other lawful activity for the removal and
management of Invasive woody species.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2169 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

E. By February 15 each year the Commission shall submit a
report to the Legislature detailing the actions taken and the
progress made under the requirements of this act.
F. The Commission is authorized to use up to One Million
Dollars ($1,000,000.00) each year, as determined and approved by the
Commissioners, to effectuate the provisions of this act. No
additional state resources shall be allocated to the Commission to
effectuate the provisions of this act; however, the Commission may
receive state resources through coordination with the Oklahoma
Conservation Commission, or other state agency, in effectuating the
provisions of this act.
G. The Commissioners of the Land Office shall promulgate any
rules necessary to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
February 23, 2026 - DO PASS









SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2169 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)